Illinois, session 104th, HB3377.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.206 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. Funding for homeless children and youth. 8    (a) School districts shall report to the State Board of 9Education, on an annual basis:10        (1) the amount of funds received by each school 11    district in the preceding school year under 20 U.S.C. 12    6313(c)(3)(A);13        (2) the amount of funds reserved by each school 14    district in the preceding school year to serve homeless 15    children and youth under 20 U.S.C. 6313(c)(3)(A);16        (3) the number of homeless children and youth 17    identified and enrolled in each school district for that 18    same school year;19        (4) the amount of such funds that were spent on 20    homeless children and youth; and21        (5) the activities on which such funds were spent.22    (b) The State Board of Education shall post the 23information on the State Board's website.  HB3377 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11324 LNS 21411 b1    (c) For the purposes of this Section, "homeless children 2and youth" are defined as set forth in in 42 U.S.C. 11434a.